Tennessee, session 114, HB0034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-133, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting:
(b) The disposition of a child and evidence adduced in a hearing in juvenile court
must not be used against such child in any proceeding in any court other than a juvenile
court, whether before or after reaching majority, except in:
(1) Pretrial reports used to set bonds;
(2) Dispositional proceedings after conviction of a felony for the purposes
of a presentence investigation and report;
(3) A proceeding pursuant to § 39-17-1352; or
(4) A criminal prosecution for a violation of the prohibition on purchasing
or possessing firearms imposed under § 37-1-190.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-153, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(4) and substituting:
(4) A court and its probation and other officials or professional staff and the
attorney for the defendant for use in pretrial reports used to set bonds and preparing a
presentence report in a criminal case in which the defendant is convicted and who prior
thereto had been a party to the proceeding in juvenile court;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-11-118, is amended by deleting
subdivision (b)(7) and substituting:
HB0034
000529
- 1 -

(7) The defendant's prior juvenile record and prior criminal record and the
likelihood that because of the records the defendant will pose a risk of danger to the
community;
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000529